Washington statutes.
RCW 8.04.180

Condemnation for military purposes—Construction.

Nothing contained in RCW 8.04.170 shall be construed as in any manner applying to condemnation by any county for the purpose of acquiring title to any site for a mobilization, training and supply station, to be donated by any county to the United States.

[ 1917 c 153 s 2; RRS s 900-2.]